Utah statutes.
76-7-331.   Public funding of abortion forbidden.

(1)  As used in this section, "damage to a major bodily function" refers only to injury or impairment of a physical nature and may not be interpreted to mean mental, psychological, or emotional harm, illness, or distress.

(2)  Public funds of the state, its institutions, or its political subdivisions may not be used to pay or otherwise reimburse, either directly or indirectly, any person, agency, or facility for the performance of any induced abortion services unless:

(a)  in the professional judgment of the pregnant woman's attending physician, the abortion is necessary to save the pregnant woman's life;

(b)  the pregnancy is the result of rape or incest reported to law enforcement agencies, unless the woman was unable to report the crime for physical reasons or fear of retaliation; or

(c)  in the professional judgment of the pregnant woman's attending physician, the abortion is necessary to prevent permanent, irreparable, and grave damage to a major bodily function of the pregnant woman provided that a caesarian procedure or other medical procedure that could also save the life of the child is not a viable option.

(3)  Any officer or employee of the state who knowingly authorizes the use of funds prohibited by this section shall be dismissed from that person's office or position and the person's employment shall be immediately terminated.



Enacted by Chapter 271, 2004 General Session

